pt-BR: Corte do calçado: Cano alto; Cano baixo; Cano médio; Outro
el: Γραμμή υποδημάτων: Ψηλό κόψιμο; Χαμηλό κόψιμο; Μεσαίο κόψιμο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Avalynės aukštis: Aukšto aulo; Žemo aulo; Vidutinio aulo; Kita
th: การตัดรองเท้า: หุ้มข้อสูง; หุ้มข้อต่ำ; หุ้มข้อปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
sv: Skoskaftets höjd: Högt skaft; Lågt skaft; Halvhögt skaft; Övrigt
sk-SK: Strih obuvi: Vysoký strih; Nízky strih; Stredný strih; Iné
en: Footwear cut: High cut; Low cut; Mid cut; Other
bg-BG: Височина на обувката: Високи; Ниски; Средни; Друг
zh-TW: 鞋款筒高: 高筒; 低筒; 中筒; 其他
nb: Fottøyskjæring: Høyt snitt; Lavt snitt; Mellomhøyt snitt; Annet
ja: 靴のカット: ハイカット; ローカット; ミッドカット; その他
ro-RO: Croială de încălțăminte: Croială înaltă; Croială joasă; Croială medie; Altele
nl: Schoeisel snit: Hoog uitgesneden; Laag uitgesneden; Halfhoog uitgesneden; Overige
vi: Kiểu dáng giày dép: Cổ cao; Cổ thấp; Cổ trung; Khác
pt-PT: Corte de calçado: Cano alto; Cano baixo; Cano médio; Outro
fi: Jalkineiden malli: Korkeavartinen; Matalavartinen; Puolivartinen; Muu
ru: Высота голенища обуви: Высокие; Низкие; Средние; Другое
tr: Ayakkabı kesimi: Yüksek kesim; Düşük kesim; Orta kesim; Diğer
da: Fodtøjets snit: Højt skaft; Lavt skaft; Mellemhøjt skaft; Andet
zh-CN: 鞋型剪裁: 高帮; 低帮; 中帮; 其他
es: Corte de calzado: Corte alto; Corte bajo; Corte medio; Otro
fr: Coupe de la chaussure: Coupe haute; Coupe basse; Coupe mi-haute; Autre
ko: 신발 컷: 하이 컷; 로우 컷; 미드 컷; 기타
de: Schafthöhe des Schuhs: High-Cut; Low-Cut; Mid-Cut; Sonstiges
hu: Cipő szabása: Magas szárú; Alacsony szárú; Középmagas szárú; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kroj obuće: Visoki rez; Niski rez; Srednji rez; Ostalo
pl: Krój obuwia: Wysoka cholewka; Niska cholewka; Średnia cholewka; Inna
it: Calzature tagliate: Taglio alto; Taglio basso; Taglio medio; Altro
sl-SI: Kroj obutve: Visok kroj; Nizek kroj; Srednji kroj; Drugo
cs: Střih obuvi: Vysoký střih; Nízký střih; Střední střih; Jiné